trunk/incubator/apertium-es-ast.ast.dix
    <pardef n="/per__pr">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>per</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>per</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pel</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pela</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pelo</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pelos</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>peles</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/por__pr">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>por</l>
          <r>por<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>por</l>
          <r>por<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pol</l>
          <r>por<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pola</l>
          <r>por<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>polo</l>
          <r>por<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>polos</l>
          <r>por<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>poles</l>
          <r>por<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/en__pr">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nel</l>
          <r>en<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>en<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>en<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nos</l>
          <r>en<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nes</l>
          <r>en<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- Conxunciones -->
    <pardef n="y__cnjcoo">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ya</l>
          <r>y<s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pero__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="que__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="que__rel">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- Adverbs -->
    <pardef n="tamién__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- Determiners -->
    <pardef n="to/u__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lo</l>
          <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>los</l>
          <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>les</l>
          <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="un__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/el__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lo</l>
          <r>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>los</l>
          <r>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>les</l>
          <r>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aquel__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lo</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>los</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>les</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="que"><i>que</i><par n="que__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="el"><i/><par n="/el__det"/></e>
    <e lm="un"><i>un</i><par n="un__det"/></e>
    <e lm="tou"><i>to</i><par n="to/u__det"/></e>
    <e lm="aquel"><i>aquel</i><par n="aquel__det"/></e>
    <e lm="naquel"><p><l>naquel</l><r>en<s n="pr"/><j/>aquel</r></p><par n="aquel__det"/></e>
    <e lm="y"><i/><par n="y__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="pero"><i>pero</i><par n="pero__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="que"><i>que</i><par n="que__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="en"><i/><par n="/en__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="per"><i/><par n="/per__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="por"><i/><par n="/por__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="tamién"><i>tamién</i><par n="tamién__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="más"><i>más</i><par n="tamién__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="qu'"><p><l>qu'</l><r>que</r></p><par n="que__cnjsub"/></e>
